nb: Elektronikk > Datamaskiner: Alt-i-ett datamaskiner; Minimale datamaskiner; Datamaskinservere; Stasjonære datamaskiner; Spilldatamaskiner; Håndholdte enheter; Interaktive kiosker; Bærbare datamaskiner; Smartbriller; Nettbrett; Tynn- og nullklienter; Stasjonære touchdatamaskiner
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > คอมพิวเตอร์: คอมพิวเตอร์ออลอินวัน; คอมพิวเตอร์แบร์โบน; เซิร์ฟเวอร์คอมพิวเตอร์; คอมพิวเตอร์เดสก์ท็อป; คอมพิวเตอร์สำหรับการเล่นเกม; อุปกรณ์แบบพกพา; คีออสก์แบบโต้ตอบ; แล็ปท็อป; แว่นตาอัจฉริยะ; คอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต; Thin และ Zero Clients; คอมพิวเตอร์แบบโต๊ะที่มีจอสัมผัส
cs: Elektronika > Počítače: Počítače všechno v jednom; Počítače barebone; Počítačové servery; Stolní počítače; Herní počítače; Přenosná zařízení; Interaktivní kiosky; Notebooky; Chytré brýle; Tablety; Tencí a nuloví klienti; Počítače v dotykových tabulích
sk-SK: Elektronika > Počítače: Všetko v jednom počítače; Barebone počítače; Počítačové servery; Stolné počítače; Herné počítače; Ručné zariadenia; Interaktívne kiosky; Prenosné počítače; Inteligentné okuliare; Tabletové počítače; Tenkí a nuloví klienti; Dotykové stolné počítače
ro-RO: Electronice > Calculatoare: Calculatoare all-in-one; Calculatoare cu configurație de bază semi-asamblate; Servere de calculatoare; Calculatoare desktop; Calculatoare pentru jocuri; Dispozitive portabile; Chioșcuri interactive; Laptopuri; Ochelari inteligenți; Calculatoare tip tabletă; Calculatoare Thin Client și Zero Client; Calculatoare tip masă interactivă
ko: 전자기기 > 컴퓨터: 일체형 컴퓨터; 반제품 컴퓨터; 컴퓨터 서버; 데스크톱 컴퓨터; 게임용 컴퓨터; 휴대용 기기; 대화형 키오스크; 노트북; 스마트 안경; 태블릿 컴퓨터; 씬/제로 클라이언트; 터치식 테이블 컴퓨터
ru: Электроника > Компьютеры: Моноблоки; Barebone-системы; Серверы; Настольные компьютеры; Игровые компьютеры; Портативные устройства; Информационные киоски; Ноутбуки; Умные очки; Планшетные компьютеры; Тонкие и нулевые клиенты; Интерактивные сенсорные столы
fi: Elektroniikka > Tietokoneet: All-in-One-tietokoneet; Barebone-tietokoneet; Tietokonepalvelimet; Pöytätietokoneet; Pelitietokoneet; Kannetavat laitteet; Itsepalvelukioskit; Kannettavat tietokoneet; Älylasit; Tablettitietokoneet; Kevyet asiakaspäätteet; Kosketuspöydät
sl-SI: Elektronika > Računalniki: Računalniki vse-v-enem; Osnovni računalniški sistemi; Računalniški strežniki; Namizni računalniki; Gaming računalniki; Ročne naprave; Interaktivne informacijske točke; Prenosni računalniki; Pametna očala; Tablični računalniki; Tanki in ničelni odjemalci; Namizni računalniki na dotik
sv: Elektronik > Datorer: Allt-i-ett-datorer; Barebonedatorer; Datorservrar; Stationära datorer; Speldatorer; Handhållna enheter; Interaktiva kiosker; Bärbara datorer; Smarta glasögon; Surfplattor; Tunna klienter och nollklienter; Pekskärmsdatorer
fr: Appareil électronique > Ordinateurs: Ordinateurs tout-en-un; PC Barebone; Serveurs informatiques; Ordinateurs de bureau; Ordinateurs pour jeu; Appareils mobiles; Bornes interactives; Ordinateurs portables; Lunettes intelligentes; Tablettes multimédias; Clients légers et zéro; Tables tactiles
da: Elektronik > Computere: Alt-i-en-computere; Barebonecomputer; Computerservere; Skrivebordscomputere; Gamingcomputere; Håndholdte enheder; Interaktive terminaler; Bærbare computere; Smartglasses; Tabletcomputere; Tynde klienter og nulklienter; Berøringsfølsomme bordcomputere
bg-BG: Електроника > Компютри: Комбинирани компютри тип „всичко в едно“; Полуготови компютри; Компютърни сървъри; Настолни компютри; Гейминг компютри; Ръчни устройства; Информационни павилиони; Лаптопи; Смарточила; Таблетни компютри; Тънки и нулеви клиенти; Интерактивни маси
pl: Elektronika > Komputery: Komputery typu All-in-One; Komputery typu barebone; Serwery komputerowe; Komputery stacjonarne; Komputery do gier; Palmtopy; Infokioski; Laptopy; Okulary typu „smart glasses”; Tablety; Komputery typu cienki klient i zerowy klient; Komputery touch table
de: Elektronik > Computer: All-in-one-Computer; Barebone-Computer; Computerserver; Desktop-Computer; Gaming-Computer; E-Book-Reader & Handheld-Computer; Interaktive Kioske; Laptops; Datenbrillen; Tablet-PCs; Thin Clients & Zero Clients; Multitouch-Tischcomputer
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Υπολογιστές: Υπολογιστές all-in-one; Υπολογιστές Barebone; Διακομιστές υπολογιστών; Επιτραπέζιοι υπολογιστές; Υπολογιστές για παιχνίδια; Φορητές συσκευές; Διαδραστικά περίπτερα; Φορητοί υπολογιστές; Έξυπνα γυαλιά; Υπολογιστές Tablet; Υπολογιστές-πελάτες Thin & Zero; Υπολογιστές με επιφάνεια αφής
lt-LT: Elektronika > Kompiuteriai: Viskas viename kompiuteriai; Kompiuterių platformos; Serveriai; Staliniai kompiuteriai; Žaidimų kompiuteriai; Nešiojamieji įrenginiai; Interaktyvūs kioskai; Nešiojamieji kompiuteriai; Išmanieji akiniai; Planšetiniai kompiuteriai; Mažafunkciai ir nuliniai klientiniai kompiuteriai; Jutikliniai stalo kompiuteriai
it: Elettronica > Computer: Computer all-in-one; Computer Barebone; Server; Computer desktop; Computer per gaming; Dispositivi portatili; Chioschi interattivi; Computer portatili; Smart Glass; Computer tablet; Thin client e zero client; Tavoli touchscreen
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電腦: 一體式電腦; 準系統電腦; 電腦伺服器; 桌上型電腦; 遊戲電腦; 手持裝置; 互動機台; 筆記型電腦; 智慧眼鏡; 平板電腦; 精簡型/極簡型電腦; 觸控桌面型電腦
es: Electrónica > Computadoras: Computadoras todo en uno; Computadoras tipo Barebone; Servidores informáticos; Computadoras de sobremesa; Computadoras para videojuegos; Dispositivos portátiles; Kioscos interactivos; Computadoras portátiles; Gafas inteligentes; Tablets; Clientes livianos y delgados; Mesas táctiles
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Computadores: Computadores tudo-em-um; Computadores Barebone; Servidores de computador; Computadores de secretária; Computadores para jogos; Dispositivos portáteis; Quiosques interativos; Portáteis; Óculos inteligentes; Tablets; Clientes Thin e clientes Zero; Computadores táteis
tr: Elektronik > Bilgisayarlar: Hepsi Bir Arada Bilgisayarlar; Temel Bilgisayar Sistemleri; Bilgisayar Sunucuları; Masaüstü Bilgisayarlar; Oyun Bilgisayarları; Elde Taşınabilir Cihazlar; İnteraktif Kiosklar; Dizüstü Bilgisayarlar; Akıllı Gözlükler; Tablet Bilgisayarlar; Thin ve Zero Client'lar; Dokunmatik Masa Bilgisayarlar
hu: Elektronika > Számítógépek: Egyben számítógépek; Barebone számítógépek; Számítógépes szerverek; Asztali számítógépek; Játékszámítógépek; Kézi eszközök; Interaktív kioszkok; Laptopok; Okosszemüvegek; Táblagépek; Vékony és zéró kliensek; Érintőtáblás számítógépek
hr-HR: Elektronika > Računala: Sveobuhvatna računala; Barebone računala; Računalni poslužitelji; Stolna računala; Računala za igre; Ručni uređaji; Interaktivni kiosci; Prijenosna računala; Pametne naočale; Tableti; Tanki i nulti klijenti; Digitalni stolovi
en: Electronics > Computers: All-in-One Computers; Barebone Computers; Computer Servers; Desktop Computers; Gaming Computers; Handheld Devices; Interactive Kiosks; Laptops; Smart Glasses; Tablet Computers; Thin & Zero Clients; Touch Table Computers
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Computadores: Computadores all-in-one; Computadores Barebone; Servidores; Desktops; PC gamer; Dispositivos portáteis; Quiosques interativos; Laptops; Óculos inteligentes; Computadores tablet; Thin clients e zero clients; Computadores de mesa sensíveis ao toque
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Máy vi tính: Máy tính tất cả trong một; Máy tính đóng hộp; Máy chủ; Máy tính để bàn; Máy tính chơi game; Thiết bị cầm tay; Ki-ốt tương tác; Laptop; Kính thông minh; Máy tính bảng; Máy trạm không xử lý và máy trạm nhỏ; Máy tính dạng bàn cảm ứng
nl: Elektronica > Computers: All-in-one computers; Barebone computers; Computerservers; Desktopcomputers; Gamingcomputers; Handheldapparaten; Interactieve kiosken; Laptops; Smartbrillen; Tabletcomputers; Thin- en zeroclients; Computers met aanraaktafels
ja: 電子機器 > コンピューター: 一体型パソコン; ベアボーンPC; サーバー; デスクトップPC; ゲーミングコンピューター; 携帯端末; キオスク端末; ノートPC; スマート グラス; タブレットPC; シンクライアント・ゼロクライアント; タッチテーブルコンピューター
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 计算机: 一体机电脑; 计算机裸机; 服务器; 台式电脑; 游戏电脑; 手持设备; 互动式自助服务终端; 笔记本电脑; 智能眼镜; 平板电脑; 轻薄/零硬件客户端; 触摸屏桌式电脑